North Carolina statutes. Chapter 62. Public Utilities.
Article 16. Security Provisions.

§ 62-333.
Screening employment applications.

The Chief Personnel Officer, or that person’s designee, of any public utility franchised to do business in North Carolina shall be permitted to obtain from the State Bureau of Investigation a confidential copy of criminal history record information for screening an applicant for employment with or an employee of a utility or utility contractor where the employment or job to be performed falls within a class or category of positions certified by the North Carolina Utilities Commission as permitting or requiring access to nuclear power facilities or access to or control over nuclear material.

The State Bureau of Investigation shall charge a reasonable fee to defray the administrative costs of providing criminal history record information for purposes of employment application screening. The State Bureau of Investigation is authorized to retain fees charged pursuant to this section and to expend those fees in accordance with the State Budget Act for the purpose of discharging its duties under this section.

History.

1979, c. 796; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1212, s. 10; 2013-410, s. 6.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-410, s. 6.1, effective August 23, 2013, substituted “Officer, or that person’s designee” for “Officer or his designee” in the first paragraph, and substituted “State Budget Act” for “Executive Budget Act” in the second paragraph.

§§ 62-334 through 62-349.

Reserved for future codification.